Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.913

Transfer of powers from Washington institute for applied technology to Seattle Vocational Institute.

The public nonprofit corporation for the Washington institute for applied technology is hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby transferred to the sixth college district. The Washington institute for applied technology shall be renamed the Seattle Vocational Institute. The Seattle Vocational Institute shall become a fourth unit of the sixth college district. All references to the director or public nonprofit corporation for the Washington institute for applied technology in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director of the Seattle Vocational Institute.

[ 1991 c 238 s 94.]